Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3914
Notice of proceeding.

If a petition
for the appointment of a guardian or issuance of a protective order is brought
in this state and this state was not the respondent's home state on the date
the petition was filed, in addition to complying with the notice requirements
of this state, notice of the petition must be given to those persons who would
be entitled to notice of the petition if a proceeding were brought in the
respondent's home state. The notice must be given in the same manner as notice
is required to be given in this state.

Laws 2011, LB157, § 18.